Maryland, session 2026, SB0037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–4101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “DIRECT THREAT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT.
(C) “Eligible child” means a child who has a history of trauma, has been diagnosed
with post–traumatic stress disorder, or has been diagnosed with a developmental disability
and special health care need under Title V of the Social Security Act.
(C) “DIRECT THREAT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT.
[(c)] (D) “Fund” means the Maryland Children’s Service Animal Program Fund
established under § 13–4105 of this subtitle.
[(d)] (E) “Nonprofit training entity” means a corporation, a foundation, or any
other legal entity that:
(1) Is qualified under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) (i) Engages in the training of service dogs or support dogs for use by
children; or
(ii) Uses trained therapy horses for interaction with children; and
(3) Has been selected by the Department to provide services under this
subtitle.
[(e)] (F) “Program” means the Maryland Children’s Service Animal Program
established under § 13–4102 of this subtitle.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 334
[(f)] (G) “Program participant” means an eligible child who participates in the
Program.
[(g)] (H) “Successful Program participant” means a Program participant who
successfully completes the training or therapy protocol specified by a nonprofit training
entity.
13–4102.
(a) There is a Maryland Children’s Service Animal Program in the Department.
13–4104.
(a) A nonprofit training entity may disqualify a Program participant from
participation in the Program if the nonprofit training entity determines that the Program
participant’s involvement in the Program:
(1) Presents a danger to the Program participant’s mental or physical
well–being;
(2) [Is] PRESENTS a direct threat to [the health and safety of] others;
(3) Presents a direct threat to the mental or physical well–being of the
service dog, support dog, or therapy horse; or
(4) Does not meet the training requirements of the nonprofit training
entity.
(b) A Program participant may discontinue involvement in the Program for any
reason.
Article – Human Services
7–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Disabilities.
(C) “DIRECT THREAT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT.
[(c)] (D) “Eligible individual” means a resident of the State with a disability, as
defined in the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12102.
– 3 –

Ch. 334 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (E) “Fund” means the Maryland Disability Service Animal Program Fund.
[(e)] (F) “Nonprofit training entity” means a corporation, a foundation, or any
other legal entity that:
(1) is tax–exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) engages in the training of service animals for use by eligible
individuals; and
(3) has been selected by the Department to provide services under this
subtitle.
[(f)] (G) “Program” means the Maryland Disability Service Animal Program
established under this subtitle.
[(g)] (H) “Program participant” means an eligible individual who participates in
the Program.
[(h)] (I) (1) “Service animal” means an animal that is individually trained to
do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability.
(2) “Service animal” does not include an animal that:
(i) as a result of the animal’s presence, is meant to deter crime; or
(ii) provides only emotional support, well–being, comfort, or
companionship to an individual.
[(i)] (J) “Successful Program participant” means a Program participant who
successfully completes the training protocol specified by a nonprofit training entity.
7–1502.
There is a Maryland Disability Service Animal Program in the Department.
7–1505.
(a) To be eligible for selection as a nonprofit training entity under [§ 7–1204] §
7–1504 of this subtitle, a nonprofit training entity shall:
(1) serve the needs of eligible individuals in the State; and
(2) generate its own revenue and reinvest the proceeds of that revenue in
the growth and development of its programs.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 334
(b) A nonprofit training entity may disqualify a Program participant from
participation in the Program if the nonprofit training entity determines that the Program
participant’s involvement in the Program:
(1) presents a danger to the Program participant’s mental or physical
well–being;
(2) presents a direct threat to others[, as defined by the federal Americans
with Disabilities Act];
(3) presents a direct threat to the [service animal’s] mental or physical
well–being OF THE SERVICE ANIMAL; or
(4) does not meet the training requirements of the nonprofit.
(c) A Program participant may discontinue involvement in the Program for any
reason.
Article – State Government
9–957.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible family member” means a spouse or dependent of an eligible
veteran.
(3) “DIRECT THREAT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT.
[(3)] (4) “Eligible veteran” means a veteran who:
(i) is a resident of the State; or
(ii) receives treatment or care from a U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs or U.S. Department of Defense medical facility in the State.
[(4)] (5) “Fund” means the Maryland Veterans Service Animal Program
Fund established under subsection (f) of this section.
[(5)] (6) “Nonprofit training entity” means a corporation, a foundation, or
any other legal entity that:
(i) is qualified under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
– 5 –

Ch. 334 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 1. engages in the training of service dogs or support dogs for
use by veterans; or
2. uses trained therapy horses for interaction with veterans;
and
(iii) has been selected by the Department to provide services under
this section.
[(6)] (7) “Program” means the Maryland Veterans Service Animal
Program established under subsection (b) of this section.
[(7)] (8) “Program participant” means an eligible veteran or eligible
family member who participates in the Program.
[(8)] (9) “Service dog” means a dog that is individually trained to do work
or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including physical,
sensory, psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability.
[(9)] (10) “Successful Program participant” means a Program participant
who successfully completes the training or therapy protocol specified by a nonprofit training
entity.
[(10)] (11) “Support dog” means a dog that is individually trained and that
serves as an emotional support or therapy animal that a medical professional, within the
medical professional’s scope of practice, has determined provides benefit for an individual
with a sensory, psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability.
[(11)] (12) “Therapy horse” includes a horse determined appropriate for
interactions with veterans by a stable licensed by the State that:
(i) is a Professional Association of Therapeutic Horsemanship,
International (PATH, Intl.) member center; or
(ii) has Equine Assisted Growth and Learning Association
(EAGALA) certified professionals who provide services to veterans.
(b) There is a Maryland Veterans Service Animal Program in the Department.
(e) (1) A nonprofit training entity may disqualify a Program participant from
participation in the Program if the nonprofit training entity determines that the Program
participant’s involvement in the Program:
(i) presents a danger to the Program participant’s mental or
physical well–being;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 334
(ii) [has caused or may potentially cause harm] PRESENTS A
DIRECT THREAT to others[, an animal, or property];
(iii) presents a [danger] DIRECT THREAT to the MENTAL OR
PHYSICAL WELL–BEING OF THE service [dog’s] DOG, support [dog’s] DOG, or therapy
[horse’s mental or physical well–being] HORSE; or
(iv) does not meet the training requirement of the nonprofit
TRAINING ENTITY.
(2) A Program participant may discontinue involvement in the Program for
any reason.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 7 –